Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 2. Congressional, Senatorial, and House of Delegates Districts.
(501) Precincts.Twenty-ninth. All of the Cities of Manassas and Manassas Park; and part of Prince William County comprised of the Bel Air (606), Beville (205), Buckhall (103), Civic Center (604), Dale (601), Ellis (106), Enterprise (608), Freedom (609), Godwin (603), Kerrydale (607), King (206), Library (702), Neabsco (602), Potomac (302), Pr. William A (000), Saunders (201), Stonewall (405), and Westgate (407) Precincts and parts of the Bennett (102), Benton (203), Buckland Mills (110), Cedar Point (112), Featherstone (704), Lodge (207), Lynn (703), Marsteller (107), Minnieville (605), Nokesville (104), Occoquan (502), Parkside (105), Penn (210), Rippon (706), River Oaks (708), Sinclair (404), Sudley North (409), Swans Creek (311), Victory (108), and Woodbine (209) Precincts.Thirtieth. Part of Arlington County comprised of the Abingdon (022), Arlington (001), Aurora Hills (003), Claremont (028), Columbia (009), Crystal City (006), Crystal Plaza (050), Fairlington (012), Four Mile Run (047), Glebe (030), Oakridge (032), Shirlington (042), and Virginia Highlands (021) Precincts; part of Fairfax County comprised of the Belle Haven (601), Belleview (602), Cameron (402), Clermont (423), Fort Hunt (605), Grosvenor (621), Huntington (607), Marlan (609), Mount Eagle (408), Waynewood (612), Westgate (613), and Whitman (614) Precincts and parts of the Groveton (405), Gunston (616), Hayfield (406), Hollin Hall (606), Rose Hill (410), Stratford (611), Villages (420), Virginia Hills (411), Wilton (425), and Woodley (615) Precincts; and part of the City of Alexandria comprised of the Agudas Achim Synagogue (203), Blessed Sacrament Church (204), Chinquapin Park Recreation Center (206), City Hall (102), Cora Kelley Center (106), Douglas MacArthur School (205), Durant Center (104), Fire Department Headquarters (109), George Mason School (202), George Washington Middle School (108), Ladrey Senior Building (101), Lee Center (105), Lyles Crouch School (103), Maury School (201), Mt. Vernon Recreation Center (107), and Nova Arts Center (208) Precincts.Thirty-first. Part of Arlington County comprised of the Arlington Forest (025), Arlington Mill (043), Arlington View (038), Ashton Heights (002), Barcroft (005), Buckingham (045), Central (046), Cherrydale (007), Clarendon (014), Courtlands (048), Dawson (044), Fillmore (026), Glen Carlyn (013), Hume (008), Jefferson (027), Lyon Park (015), Lyon Village (016), Madison (035), Marshall (036), Monroe (049), Park Lane (018), Rosslyn (019), Taylor (051), Thrifton (020), Virginia Square (040), Wilson (010), and Woodbury (041) Precincts and part of the Ballston (004) Precinct; part of Fairfax County comprised of the Chain Bridge (301), Chesterbrook (302), Churchill (303), Clearview (321), Colvin (330), Cooper (304), Forestville (322), Great Falls (306), Hickory (328), Kenmore (309), Langley (311), Salona (316), Seneca (329), Shouse (323), Spring Hill (331), and Sugarland (327) Precincts; and part of Loudoun County comprised of the Lowes Island (607), Potomac Falls (209), Seneca (606), South Bank (609), Sugarland North (604), and Sugarland South (605) Precincts.Thirty-second. Part of Arlington County comprised of the Ashlawn (039), Dominion Hills (029), East Falls Church (011), Lexington (031), Nottingham (037), Overlee Knolls (017), Rock Spring (033), Westover (023), Woodlawn (024), and Yorktown (034) Precincts and part of the Ballston (004) Precinct; and part of Fairfax County comprised of the Aldrin (234), Cameron Glen (238), Dogwood (220), El Nido (305), Floris (203), Fox Mill (229), Freedom Hill (704), Glade (223), Haycock (307), Hunters Woods (221), Kinross (908), Kirby (310), Lees Corner East (920), Lees Corner West (927), Longfellow (312), Magarity (726), McLean (314), Navy (911), North Point (233), Pimmit (315), Reston #1 (208), Reston #2 (209), Reston #3 (222), South Lakes (224), Stuart (236), Sunrise Valley (227), Terraset (225), Tysons (731), Vale (914), Waples Mill (916), Westbriar (219), Westhampton (317), Westmoreland (318), and Wolftrap (226) Precincts and parts of the Flint Hill (202) and Franklin (905) Precincts.Thirty-third. Part of Fairfax County comprised of the Brookfield (902), Coppermine (239), Frying Pan (235), Herndon #1 (319), Herndon #2 (320), Herndon #3 (324), Hutchison (325), and McNair (237) Precincts and part of the Franklin (905) Precinct; and part of Loudoun County comprised of the Algonkian (208), Balls Bluff (406), Belmont Ridge (815), Brandon Park (506), Buchanan (211), Carter (117), Cascades (210), Claude Moore Park (212), Countryside (213), Dry Mill (503), East Leesburg (502), Farmwell Station (812), Forest Grove (705), Greenway (405), Guilford (704), Harper Park (407), Legacy (116), Mill Run (113), Mirror Ridge (608), Oak Grove (110), Park View (702), River Bend (207), Rolling Ridge (703), Selden’s Landing (813), Smart’s Mill (504), Sully (701), Tolbert (410), and West Leesburg (501) Precincts and parts of the Briar Woods (111), Cool Spring (505), Dulles South (114), Eagle Ridge (106), and Weller (816) Precincts.Thirty-fourth. All of the City of Fairfax; and part of Fairfax County comprised of the Blake (701), Bonnie Brae (126), Camelot (522), Cub Run (903), Deer Park (921), Fairfax A (0700), Greenbriar East (846), Greenbriar West (847), Kilmer (733), Laurel (119), Long Branch (122), Mantua (707), Mosby (709), Nottoway (729), Oak Hill (113), Oak Marr (732), Oakton (727), Olde Creek (109), Olley (124), Penderbrook (730), Pine Ridge (718), Poplar Tree (928), Price (711), Ridgelea (528), Robinson (123), Rocky Run (913), Sideburn (120), Stenwood (719), Stone (917), Thoreau (720), Vienna #1 (213), Vienna #2 (214), Vienna #4 (216), Vienna #6 (218), Villa (121), Wakefield (116), Walker (714), and Woodson (117) Precincts and parts of the Centerpointe (844), Flint Hill (202), Lake Braddock (118), and Popes Head (841) Precincts.Thirty-fifth. All of the City of Falls Church; part of Fairfax County comprised of the Baileys (501), Barcroft (502), Bren Mar (526), Brook Hill (521), Cardinal (128), Crestwood (415), Edsall (527), Fort Buffalo (703), Glen Forest (505), Glen Forest #2 (529), Graham (705), Greenway (706), Holmes #1 (506), Holmes #2 (530), Irving (827), Keene Mill (129), Leewood (531), Lincolnia (507), Lynbrook (418), Marshall (708), Merrifield (721), North Springfield # 1 (110), North Springfield # 2 (111), Parklawn (510), Pine Spring (710), Poe (523), Ravensworth (115), Ravenwood (511), Shreve (712), Skyline (520), Timber Lane (713), Walnut Hill # 1 (525), Walnut Hill # 2 (728), Westlawn (515), Weyanoke (516), Whittier (524), and Willston (517) Precincts and parts of the Kings Park (108) and Sleepy Hollow (512) Precincts; and part of the City of Alexandria comprised of the John Adams School (305), South Port (307), St. James Church (210), and William Ramsey School (306) Precincts.Thirty-sixth. Part of Fairfax County comprised of the Bucknell (604), Fairfield (413), Franconia (404), Huntley (424), Kirkside (608), Lorton Center (625), Sherwood (610), and Woodlawn (627) Precincts and parts of the Belvoir (619), Groveton (405), Gunston (616), Hayfield (406), Hollin Hall (606), Stratford (611), Villages (420), Virginia Hills (411), Wilton (425), and Woodley (615) Precincts; part of Prince William County comprised of the Ashland (309), Belmont (701), Bethel (506), Chinn (507), Dumfries (301), Graham Park (303), Henderson (307), Kilby (707), Montclair (308), Pattie (305), Potomac View (705), Powell (211), Quantico (304), and Washington-Reid (306) Precincts and parts of the Featherstone (704), Forest Park (310), Lodge (207), Lynn (703), Minnieville (605), Occoquan (502), Rippon (706), River Oaks (708), and Swans Creek (311) Precincts; and part of Stafford County comprised of the Griffis (301) Precinct and parts of the Rock Hill (201) and Widewater (302) Precincts.Thirty-seventh. Part of Fairfax County comprised of the Belvedere (503), Bristow (102), Bull Run (923), Burke (801), Burke Centre (127), Centre Ridge (901), Centreville (918), Chapel (104), Cherry Run (825), Columbia (518), Dulles (904), Eagle View (853), Fair Oaks (848), Fairlakes (843), Fairview (105), Heritage (106), Hummer (519), London Towne East (910), London Towne West (924), Masonville (508), Monument (852), Old Mill (925), Orange (824), Parkway (842), Pohick (811), Powell (926), Saint Albans (513), Sangster (838), Signal Hill (125), Terra Centre (130), Valley (812), Virginia Run (915), White Oaks (833), Willow Springs (851), and Woodburn (717) Precincts and parts of the Centerpointe (844), Fairfax Station (805), Green Trails (919), Hunt (624), Kings Park (108), Lake Braddock (118), Popes Head (841), and Sleepy Hollow (512) Precincts.Thirty-eighth. All of Bland, Buchanan, Dickenson, Pulaski, Russell, and Tazewell Counties; all of the Cities of Norton and Radford; part of Montgomery County comprised of the D-3 Part 2 (4032) Precinct; part of Smyth County comprised of the Rich Valley (202) and Saltville (101) Precincts; and part of Wise County comprised of the Appalachia (101), Big Stone Gap (301), Dorchester (102), East Pound (203), Guest River (103), St. Paul (403), and West Pound (104) Precincts.Thirty-ninth. Part of Fairfax County comprised of the Alban (623), Bush Hill (401), Clifton (803), Fountainhead (845), Garfield (417), Greenspring (426), Island Creek (427), Kingstowne (421), Lane (419), Laurel Hill (628), Lorton (617), Lorton Station (622), Newgate North (849), Newgate South (854), Newington (618), Pioneer (409), Saratoga (626), Silverbrook (839), South County (629), South Run (850), Van Dorn (422), West Springfield (840), and Woodyard (815) Precincts and parts of the Belvoir (619), Fairfax Station (805), Green Trails (919), Hunt (624), and Rose Hill (410) Precincts; part of Prince William County comprised of the Lake Ridge (501), McCoart (204), Mohican (505), Old Bridge (503), Rockledge (504), Signal Hill (114), Springwoods (508), and Westridge (208) Precincts and parts of the Benton (203), Parkside (105), and Penn (210) Precincts; and part of the City of Alexandria comprised of the Cameron Station Community Center (308), Charles E. Beatley Library (303), James K. Polk School (209), Patrick Henry Rec Center (302), Samuel Tucker School (304), and Temple Beth El Synagogue (207) Precincts.Fortieth. All of Grayson, Lee, Scott, and Washington Counties; all of the City of Bristol; part of Smyth County comprised of the Adwolfe (701), Atkins (501), Chilhowie (301), East Park (401), Konnarock (703), Royal Oak East (601), Royal Oak West (602), Seven Mile Ford (201), St. Clair (302), Sugar Grove (702), Wassona (502), and West Park (402) Precincts; part of Wise County comprised of the Clinch Valley (401), East Stone Gap (302), North Coeburn (201), South Coeburn (402), and Wise (202) Precincts; and part of Wythe County comprised of the Evergreen (603), Royal Oak (101), Rural Retreat (102), West Wytheville (203), and Zion (602) Precincts.

History.

2011, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision as to apportionment of State into senatorial and house districts, see Va. Const., Art. II, § 6.

For constitutional provision as to number of senators, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, Special Session I, c. 1 was subject to preclearance by the Department of Justice, pursuant to section 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. Preclearance was granted by letter dated June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, Special Session I, c. 1 is effective on April 29, 2011, pursuant to Va. Const., Art. II, § 6.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, §§ 5, 6.